Rhode Island statutes. Title 36 Public Officers and Employees
Chapter 12.2 Medicare Enrollment

36-12.2-1.
Medicare enrollment.

As a condition of receiving or continuing to receive access to post-employment benefits offered by the state, anyone entitled to this benefit shall enroll in Medicare as soon as he or she is eligible, notwithstanding the provisions of any other general law or public law to the contrary.

History of Section.

P.L. 2011, ch. 151, art. 21, § 2.